lexc/misc/enhuadvige.lexc
!!!enhuige.lexc!!!

Multichar_Symbols [stem] +Adv +Pref+

LEXICON Root
Adv;
Prefigekoto;

LEXICON Prefigekoto
+Pref+:keresztül   Adv;
+Pref+:kölcsön   Adv;
+Pref+:széjjel   Adv;
+Pref+:szembe   Adv;
+Pref+:szerte   Adv;
+Pref+:vissza   Adv;
+Pref+:helyre   Adv;
+Pref+:tovább   Adv;
+Pref+:tönkre   Adv;
+Pref+:észre   Adv;
+Pref+:rajta   Adv;
+Pref+:előre   Adv;
+Pref+:félbe   Adv;
+Pref+:félre   Adv;
+Pref+:felül   Adv;
+Pref+:fölül   Adv;
+Pref+:agyon   Adv;
+Pref+:ellen   Adv;
+Pref+:körbe   Adv;
+Pref+:körül   Adv;
+Pref+:közbe   Adv;
+Pref+:közre   Adv;
+Pref+:külön   Adv;
+Pref+:utána   Adv;
+Pref+:végbe   Adv;
+Pref+:végig   Adv;
+Pref+:hátra   Adv;
+Pref+:hozzá   Adv;
+Pref+:egybe   Adv;
+Pref+:ketté   Adv;
+Pref+:össze   Adv;
+Pref+:mellé   Adv;
+Pref+:által   Adv;
+Pref+:alul   Adv;
+Pref+:haza   Adv;
+Pref+:újra   Adv;
+Pref+:abba   Adv;
+Pref+:neki   Adv;
+Pref+:bele   Adv;
+Pref+:újjá   Adv;
+Pref+:benn   Adv;
+Pref+:fenn   Adv;
+Pref+:fönn   Adv;
+Pref+:jóvá   Adv;
+Pref+:szét   Adv;
+Pref+:tele   Adv;
+Pref+:tova   Adv;
+Pref+:meg   Adv;
+Pref+:oda   Adv;
+Pref+:elő   Adv;
+Pref+:túl   Adv;
+Pref+:alá   Adv;
+Pref+:föl   Adv;
+Pref+:ide   Adv;
+Pref+:fel   Adv;
+Pref+:rá   Adv;
+Pref+:ki   Adv;
+Pref+:le   Adv;
+Pref+:el   Adv;
+Pref+:át   Adv;
+Pref+:be   Adv;


LEXICON AddAdv
[stem]+Adv:0     #;

LEXICON Adv
adásszerűen AddAdv;
adószerűen AddAdv;
ajándékozandóan AddAdv;
akadályozottan AddAdv;
aknázottan AddAdv;
alakítóan AddAdv;
alkuvóan AddAdv;
alázkodóan AddAdv;
aprózottan AddAdv;
attikaszerűen AddAdv;
avatóan AddAdv;
babonázottan AddAdv;
bambultan AddAdv;
becsülendően AddAdv;
beszélően AddAdv;
bilincselően AddAdv;
bizakodottan AddAdv;
bizonyíthatóan AddAdv;
bocsáthatóan AddAdv;
boldogultan AddAdv;
bontakozóan AddAdv;
bonyolultan AddAdv;
borzasztóan AddAdv;
botránkoztatóan AddAdv;
bukottan AddAdv;
butultan AddAdv;
bágyadtan AddAdv;
bámultan AddAdv;
béklyózottan AddAdv;
békülten AddAdv;
bérmáltan AddAdv;
bírálóan AddAdv;
bízóan AddAdv;
búcsúzóan AddAdv;
bútorozottan AddAdv;
bőszülten AddAdv;
bővülően AddAdv;
cicomázottan AddAdv;
csalatottan AddAdv;
csapkodóan AddAdv;
csatlakozóan AddAdv;
csatornázottan AddAdv;
csendesülten AddAdv;
csillapultan AddAdv;
csitultan AddAdv;
csodáltan AddAdv;
csonkulatlanul AddAdv;
csorbultan AddAdv;
csuklóan AddAdv;
csúcsosodóan AddAdv;
csúfolódóan AddAdv;
célzóan AddAdv;
deríthetően AddAdv;
diktáltan AddAdv;
dobásszerűen AddAdv;
domborodóan AddAdv;
dugultan AddAdv;
duzzadóan AddAdv;
döfötten AddAdv;
dönthetően AddAdv;
dúcoltan AddAdv;
dühödötten AddAdv;
egyensúlyozottan AddAdv;
egyezésszerűen AddAdv;
egészítendően AddAdv;
egészülten AddAdv;
ellenőrizhetően AddAdv;
elégíthetően AddAdv;
előlegezően AddAdv;
előzötten AddAdv;
emelkedően AddAdv;
engedően AddAdv;
enyhülten AddAdv;
epekedően AddAdv;
erőszakoltan AddAdv;
esküvően AddAdv;
facsartan AddAdv;
fakultan AddAdv;
feddően AddAdv;
fedődően AddAdv;
fegyverezően AddAdv;
fejezhetően AddAdv;
fejleszthetően AddAdv;
fekvően AddAdv;
felelősen AddAdv;
ferdülten AddAdv;
figyeletlenül AddAdv;
fitymálóan AddAdv;
fogadottan AddAdv;
fogalmazódóan AddAdv;
foglalóan AddAdv;
fogódottan AddAdv;
fokozóan AddAdv;
fonottan AddAdv;
fonódottan AddAdv;
forgathatóan AddAdv;
formáltan AddAdv;
forrázottan AddAdv;
fosztottan AddAdv;
futóan AddAdv;
fáradtan AddAdv;
félbeszakadtan AddAdv;
félkörívűen AddAdv;
fésülten AddAdv;
fúlóan AddAdv;
fülelhetően AddAdv;
gallérozottan AddAdv;
gombolkozottan AddAdv;
gondolkodóan AddAdv;
gondoltan AddAdv;
gyakoroltan AddAdv;
gyorsultan AddAdv;
gyártottan AddAdv;
gyötrődötten AddAdv;
győzően AddAdv;
gyűrötten AddAdv;
görbülten AddAdv;
hagyottan AddAdv;
hajoltan AddAdv;
hajíthatóan AddAdv;
hallgathatóan AddAdv;
hallottan AddAdv;
halmozásszerűen AddAdv;
halványulóan AddAdv;
hamarkodottan AddAdv;
hangolódottan AddAdv;
hangsúlyozottan AddAdv;
hanyagolhatóan AddAdv;
harcoltan AddAdv;
hasonlítóan AddAdv;
használtan AddAdv;
hatolóan AddAdv;
határozhatóan AddAdv;
hatóan AddAdv;
hazudtolóan AddAdv;
hervasztóan AddAdv;
hibázottan AddAdv;
higgadtan AddAdv;
hivatkozhatóan AddAdv;
homorítottan AddAdv;
hozhatóan AddAdv;
hullottan AddAdv;
huzalozottan AddAdv;
hálózottan AddAdv;
hárítóan AddAdv;
hívhatóan AddAdv;
hívóan AddAdv;
hódoltan AddAdv;
húzhatóan AddAdv;
húzódóan AddAdv;
hűlten AddAdv;
idegesítően AddAdv;
ifjodottan AddAdv;
igazoltan AddAdv;
igazítottan AddAdv;
ijedősen AddAdv;
illetődötten AddAdv;
imádkozottan AddAdv;
indulóan AddAdv;
informáltan AddAdv;
iratszerűen AddAdv;
ismerendően AddAdv;
ismételhetően AddAdv;
izgatottan AddAdv;
izzóan AddAdv;
jegyzésszerűen AddAdv;
jelenítően AddAdv;
jogosítottan AddAdv;
járhatóan AddAdv;
járósan AddAdv;
jósoltan AddAdv;
kalkuláltan AddAdv;
kapcsoltan AddAdv;
kapottan AddAdv;
kavaróan AddAdv;
keményülten AddAdv;
kergülten AddAdv;
kerültedkor AddAdv;
kerültetekkor AddAdv;
keskenyedően AddAdv;
kibontakoztatásában AddAdv;
koldulatlanul AddAdv;
komplikáltan AddAdv;
kopottan AddAdv;
koreografáltan AddAdv;
koszorúzatlanul AddAdv;
kuszáltan AddAdv;
kápráztatóan AddAdv;
kényszerülten AddAdv;
kérdezhetően AddAdv;
készülten AddAdv;
kígyózóan AddAdv;
kínálatlanul AddAdv;
kísérletezően AddAdv;
kísértően AddAdv;
kívántan AddAdv;
kólintottan AddAdv;
könnyebbülten AddAdv;
köszönhetően AddAdv;
köthetően AddAdv;
kötődően AddAdv;
követhetően AddAdv;
közelítésszerűen AddAdv;
közölhetően AddAdv;
különböztetően AddAdv;
különülten AddAdv;
lakottan AddAdv;
lapultan AddAdv;
lehetően AddAdv;
lendítően AddAdv;
lepően AddAdv;
lumpoltan AddAdv;
lángolóan AddAdv;
látszóan AddAdv;
lényegülten AddAdv;
lógósan AddAdv;
magaslóan AddAdv;
magyarázottan AddAdv;
maradtan AddAdv;
martan AddAdv;
menően AddAdv;
metszően AddAdv;
mondottan AddAdv;
montírozatlanul AddAdv;
mosolyogtatóan AddAdv;
mozdítandóan AddAdv;
mozgatóan AddAdv;
mutathatóan AddAdv;
mutatóan AddAdv;
mélázóan AddAdv;
múlatlanul AddAdv;
nagyoltan AddAdv;
nehezülten AddAdv;
nyeletlenül AddAdv;
nyilatkozottan AddAdv;
nyilvánulóan AddAdv;
nyomorítottan AddAdv;
nyomtathatóan AddAdv;
nyomóan AddAdv;
nyugvóan AddAdv;
nyúltan AddAdv;
nyűtten AddAdv;
növően AddAdv;
oldandóan AddAdv;
oldódóan AddAdv;
olvadóan AddAdv;
omlottan AddAdv;
optimalizáltan AddAdv;
oszlottan AddAdv;
osztóan AddAdv;
parancsolhatatlanul AddAdv;
pezsdítően AddAdv;
pillantásszerűen AddAdv;
piszkáltan AddAdv;
pontozóan AddAdv;
próbáltan AddAdv;
pányvázottan AddAdv;
raboltan AddAdv;
ragadtatottan AddAdv;
rajzoltan AddAdv;
rakhatóan AddAdv;
redukáltan AddAdv;
rejlően AddAdv;
remegtetően AddAdv;
rendelhetően AddAdv;
rendítően AddAdv;
repültemben AddAdv;
revivően AddAdv;
riasztóan AddAdv;
robbanóan AddAdv;
rohanóan AddAdv;
romlottan AddAdv;
rongálatlanul AddAdv;
ropogtatóan AddAdv;
rugaszkodottan AddAdv;
ráncolatlanul AddAdv;
rántatlanul AddAdv;
rázkódtatóan AddAdv;
rémülten AddAdv;
róhatóan AddAdv;
rövidítetlenül AddAdv;
sajgóan AddAdv;
sajátítóan AddAdv;
segítendően AddAdv;
semmisítően AddAdv;
silabizálatlanul AddAdv;
sivítóan AddAdv;
sokszorozottan AddAdv;
soványodottan AddAdv;
sugárzóan AddAdv;
szabadítottan AddAdv;
szabhatóan AddAdv;
szakadozóan AddAdv;
szakítottan AddAdv;
szellőzhetetlenül AddAdv;
szentesítetlenül AddAdv;
szerethetően AddAdv;
szignózatlanul AddAdv;
szipolyozóan AddAdv;
szolgáltatottan AddAdv;
szontyolodottan AddAdv;
szálazhatóan AddAdv;
szállóan AddAdv;
számoltathatóan AddAdv;
szánatlanul AddAdv;
szárnyalóan AddAdv;
szégyenítően AddAdv;
színesítően AddAdv;
szólásszerűen AddAdv;
szólóan AddAdv;
szóródottan AddAdv;
szülten AddAdv;
szűkülten AddAdv;
szűrten AddAdv;
sózottan AddAdv;
sötétlően AddAdv;
súlyozóan AddAdv;
tagadóan AddAdv;
takargatottan AddAdv;
tanulhatóan AddAdv;
tapasztatlanul AddAdv;
taroltan AddAdv;
tartottan AddAdv;
tartóztatatlanul AddAdv;
taszítóan AddAdv;
tekinthetően AddAdv;
telhetően AddAdv;
terhelően AddAdv;
terjesztően AddAdv;
terülten AddAdv;
tetőzően AddAdv;
tikkasztóan AddAdv;
tisztultan AddAdv;
tojtan AddAdv;
tompítottan AddAdv;
torzultan AddAdv;
tudatatlanul AddAdv;
tukmálóan AddAdv;
tágítottan AddAdv;
támasztottan AddAdv;
tápláltan AddAdv;
társulóan AddAdv;
távolodottan AddAdv;
távolítóan AddAdv;
tépázatlanul AddAdv;
térülően AddAdv;
tételszerűen AddAdv;
téveszthetően AddAdv;
töltően AddAdv;
törpülten AddAdv;
törődötten AddAdv;
túlzottan AddAdv;
tűrhetően AddAdv;
ugrottan AddAdv;
unottan AddAdv;
utaltan AddAdv;
vacogtatóan AddAdv;
vakoltan AddAdv;
vallatóan AddAdv;
valóan AddAdv;
varrottan AddAdv;
vasalhatatlanul AddAdv;
vegyíthetetlenül AddAdv;
verően AddAdv;
veszően AddAdv;
vetkőzötten AddAdv;
vevően AddAdv;
vidámultan AddAdv;
vihetően AddAdv;
villanóan AddAdv;
világosultan AddAdv;
virradóan AddAdv;
viselhetően AddAdv;
vitatottan AddAdv;
vizsgáltan AddAdv;
vonatkoztatottan AddAdv;
vonatszerűen AddAdv;
vontathatatlanul AddAdv;
vulkanizáltan AddAdv;
vághatóan AddAdv;
válaszoltan AddAdv;
vállaltan AddAdv;
változtathatóan AddAdv;
váltósan AddAdv;
várakozóan AddAdv;
váróan AddAdv;
végezhetően AddAdv;
vénülten AddAdv;
vételszerűen AddAdv;
zavarhatóan AddAdv;
zavaródottan AddAdv;
zizegően AddAdv;
zsírozottan AddAdv;
zárhatóan AddAdv;
záróan AddAdv;
ábrándítóan AddAdv;
ájultan AddAdv;
állapíthatóan AddAdv;
álltan AddAdv;
állítóan AddAdv;
áradozóan AddAdv;
árulóan AddAdv;
átkozottan AddAdv;
élcelődően AddAdv;
élezően AddAdv;
élénkpirosan AddAdv;
élően AddAdv;
épülten AddAdv;
érdemlően AddAdv;
érthetően AddAdv;
érően AddAdv;
ítélően AddAdv;
öltözötten AddAdv;
ötlően AddAdv;
ületlenül AddAdv;
ütősen AddAdv;
